Ohio, session 136, HB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3317.0212, 3327.01, and 3327.016 9
be amended and new section 3327.021 and section 3317.071 of the 10
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 11
Sec. 3317.0212. (A) As used in this section: 12
(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "assigned bus" means a 13
school bus used to transport qualifying riders. 14
(2) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "density" means the 15
total riders per square mile of a school district. 16
(3) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "nontraditional 17
ridership" means the average number of qualifying riders who are 18

H. B. No. 545 Page 2
As Introduced
enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314. 19
of the Revised Code, in a STEM school established under Chapter 20
3326. of the Revised Code, or in a nonpublic school and are 21
provided school bus service by a school district during the 22
first full week of October. 23
(4) "Qualifying riders" means the following: 24
(a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, resident students 25
enrolled in preschool and regular education in grades 26
kindergarten to twelve who are provided school bus service by a 27
school district, including students with dual enrollment in a 28
joint vocational school district or a cooperative education 29
school district, and students enrolled in a community school, 30
STEM school, or nonpublic school; 31
(b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 32
students specified by the general assembly. 33
(5) "Qualifying ridership" means the following: 34
(a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the greater of the 35
average number of qualifying riders counted in the morning or 36
counted in the afternoon who are provided school bus service by 37
a school district during the first full week of October; 38
(b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 39
a ridership determined in a manner specified by the general 40
assembly. 41
(6) "Rider density" means the following: 42
(a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the following 43
quotient: 44
A school district's total number of qualifying riders/ the 45
number of square miles in the district 46

H. B. No. 545 Page 3
As Introduced
(b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 47
a number calculated in a manner determined by the general 48
assembly. 49
(7) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "riders" means 50
students enrolled in regular and special education in grades 51
kindergarten through twelve who are provided school bus service 52
by a school district, including students with dual enrollment in 53
a joint vocational school district or a cooperative education 54
school district, and students enrolled in a community school, 55
STEM school, or nonpublic school. 56
(8) "School bus service" means a school district's 57
transportation of qualifying riders in any of the following 58
types of vehicles: 59
(a) School buses owned or leased by the district; 60
(b) School buses operated by a private contractor hired by 61
the district; 62
(c) School buses operated by another school district or 63
entity with which the district has contracted, either as part of 64
a consortium for the provision of transportation or otherwise. 65
(B) Not later than the first day of November, for fiscal 66
years 2026 and 2027, or a date determined by the general 67
assembly, for fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 68
of each year, each city, local, and exempted village school 69
district shall report to the department of education and 70
workforce its qualifying ridership and any other information 71
requested by the department. Subsequent adjustments to the 72
reported numbers shall be made only in accordance with rules 73
adopted by the department. 74
(C) The department shall calculate the statewide 75

H. B. No. 545 Page 4
As Introduced
transportation cost per student as follows: 76
(1) Determine each city, local, and exempted village 77
school district's transportation cost per student by dividing 78
the district's total costs for school bus service in the 79
previous fiscal year by its qualifying ridership in the previous 80
fiscal year. 81
(2) After excluding districts that do not provide school 82
bus service and the ten districts with the highest 83
transportation costs per student and the ten districts with the 84
lowest transportation costs per student, divide the aggregate 85
cost for school bus service for the remaining districts in the 86
previous fiscal year by the aggregate qualifying ridership of 87
those districts in the previous fiscal year. 88
(D) The department shall calculate the statewide 89
transportation cost per mile as follows: 90
(1) Determine each city, local, and exempted village 91
school district's transportation cost per mile by dividing the 92
district's total costs for school bus service in the previous 93
fiscal year by its total number of miles driven for school bus 94
service in the previous fiscal year. 95
(2) After excluding districts that do not provide school 96
bus service and the ten districts with the highest 97
transportation costs per mile and the ten districts with the 98
lowest transportation costs per mile, divide the aggregate cost 99
for school bus service for the remaining districts in the 100
previous fiscal year by the aggregate miles driven for school 101
bus service in those districts in the previous fiscal year. 102
(E) The department shall calculate each city, local, and 103
exempted village school district's transportation base payment 104

H. B. No. 545 Page 5
As Introduced
as follows: 105
(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027: 106
(a) Calculate the sum of the following: 107
(i) The product of the statewide transportation cost per 108
student and the number of students counted in the district's 109
qualifying ridership for the current fiscal year who are 110
enrolled in the district; 111
(ii) 1.5 times the The statewide transportation cost per 112
student times the number of students counted in the district's 113
qualifying ridership for the current fiscal year who are 114
enrolled in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of 115
the Revised Code or STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. 116
of the Revised Code times either of the following: 117
(I) For fiscal year 2026, 1.5; 118
(II) For fiscal year 2027, 2.0; 119
(iii) 2.0 times the The statewide transportation cost per 120
student times the number of students counted in the district's 121
qualifying ridership for the current fiscal year who are 122
enrolled in nonpublic schools times either of the following: 123
(I) For fiscal year 2026, 2.0; 124
(II) For fiscal year 2027, 3.0. 125
(b) Calculate the sum of the following: 126
(i) The product of the statewide transportation cost per 127
mile and the number of miles driven for school bus service as 128
reported for qualifying riders for the current fiscal year who 129
are enrolled in the district; 130
(ii) 1.5 times the statewide transportation cost per mile 131

H. B. No. 545 Page 6
As Introduced
times the number of miles driven for school bus service as 132
reported for qualifying riders for the current fiscal year who 133
are enrolled in community schools or STEM schools; 134
(iii) 2.0 times the statewide transportation cost per mile 135
times the number of miles driven for school bus service as 136
reported for qualifying riders for the current fiscal year who 137
are enrolled in nonpublic schools. 138
(c) Multiply the greater of the amounts calculated under 139
divisions (E)(1)(a) and (b) of this section by the following: 140
(i) For fiscal year 2026, the greater of forty-five and 141
eighty-three hundredths per cent or the district's state share 142
percentage, as defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code; 143
(ii) For fiscal year 2027, the greater of fifty per cent 144
or the district's state share percentage. 145
(2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 146
an amount determined by the general assembly. 147
(F) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department shall 148
pay a district's efficiency adjustment payment in accordance 149
with divisions (F)(1) to (3) of this section. For fiscal year 150
2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall pay a 151
district's efficiency adjustment payment in a manner determined 152
by the general assembly, if the general assembly authorizes such 153
a payment to districts. 154
(1) The department annually shall establish a target 155
number of qualifying riders per assigned bus for each city, 156
local, and exempted village school district. The department 157
shall use the data from the previous fiscal year in establishing 158
the target number. The target number shall be based on the 159
statewide median number of riders per assigned bus as adjusted 160

H. B. No. 545 Page 7
As Introduced
to reflect the district's density in comparison to the density 161
of all other districts. The department shall post on the 162
department's web site each district's target number of riders 163
per assigned bus and a description of how the target number was 164
determined. 165
(2) The department shall determine each school district's 166
efficiency index by dividing the district's number of riders per 167
assigned bus by its target number of riders per assigned bus. 168
(3) The department shall determine each city, local, and 169
exempted village school district's efficiency adjustment payment 170
as follows: 171
(a) If the district's efficiency index is equal to or 172
greater than 1.5, the efficiency adjustment payment shall be 173
calculated according to the following formula: 174
0.15 X the district's transportation base payment calculated 175
under division (E) of this section 176
(b) If the district's efficiency index is less than 1.5 177
but greater than or equal to 1.0, the efficiency adjustment 178
payment shall be calculated according to the following formula: 179
{[(The district's efficiency index - 1) X 0.15]/0.5} X the 180
district's transportation base payment calculated under division 181
(E) of this section 182
(c) If the district's efficiency index is less than 1.0, 183
the efficiency adjustment payment shall be zero. 184
(G) In addition to funds paid under divisions (E), (F), 185
and (H) of this section, each city, local, and exempted village 186
district shall receive in accordance with rules adopted by the 187
department a payment for students transported by means other 188

H. B. No. 545 Page 8
As Introduced
than school bus service and whose transportation is not funded 189
under division (C) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. The 190
rules shall include provisions for school district reporting of 191
such students. 192
(H)(1) For purposes of division (H) of this section, a 193
school district's "transportation supplement percentage" means 194
the following: 195
(a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the following 196
quotient: 197
(28 – the district's rider density) / 100 198
If the result of the calculation for a district under 199
division (H)(1)(a) of this section is less than zero, the 200
district's transportation supplement percentage shall be zero. 201
(b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 202
a percentage calculated in a manner determined by the general 203
assembly. 204
(2) The department shall pay each district a 205
transportation supplement calculated according to the following 206
formula: 207
The district's transportation supplement percentage X the amount 208
calculated for the district under division (E)(1)(b) of this 209
section X 0.55 210
(I)(1) If a school district board and a community school 211
governing authority elect to enter into an agreement under 212
division (A) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code, the 213
department shall make payments to the community school according 214
to the terms of the agreement for each student actually 215
transported under division (C)(1) of that section. If a 216

H. B. No. 545 Page 9
As Introduced
community school governing authority accepts transportation 217
responsibility under division (B) of that section, the 218
department shall make payments to the community school for each 219
student actually transported or for whom transportation is 220
arranged by the community school under division (C)(1) of that 221
section, calculated as follows: 222
(a) For any fiscal year which the general assembly has 223
specified that transportation payments to school districts be 224
based on an across-the-board percentage of the district's 225
payment for the previous school year, the per pupil payment to 226
the community school shall be the following quotient: 227
(i) The total amount calculated for the school district in 228
which the child is entitled to attend school for student 229
transportation other than transportation of children with 230
disabilities; divided by 231
(ii) The number of students included in the district's 232
transportation ADM for the current fiscal year, as calculated 233
under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, plus the number of 234
students enrolled in the community school not counted in the 235
district's transportation ADM who are transported under division 236
(B)(1) or (2) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code. 237
(b) For any fiscal year which the general assembly has 238
specified that the transportation payments to school districts 239
be calculated in accordance with this section and any rules of 240
the department implementing this section, the payment to the 241
community school shall be the following: 242
(i) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, either of the 243
following: 244
(I) If the school district in which the student is 245

H. B. No. 545 Page 10
As Introduced
entitled to attend school would have used a method of 246
transportation for the student for which payments are computed 247
and paid under division (E) of this section, 1.0 times the 248
statewide transportation cost per student, as calculated in 249
division (C) of this section; 250
(II) If the school district in which the student is 251
entitled to attend school would have used a method of 252
transportation for the student for which payments are computed 253
and paid in a manner described in division (G) of this section, 254
the amount that would otherwise be computed for and paid to the 255
district. 256
(ii) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, 257
an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general 258
assembly. 259
The community school, however, is not required to use the 260
same method to transport the student. 261
As used in this division, "entitled to attend school" 262
means entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 263
of the Revised Code. 264
(2) A community school shall be paid under division (I)(2) 265
of this section only for students who are eligible as specified 266
in section 3327.01 of the Revised Code and division (C)(1) of 267
section 3314.091 of the Revised Code, and whose transportation 268
to and from school is actually provided, who actually utilized 269
transportation arranged, or for whom a payment in lieu of 270
transportation is made by the community school's governing 271
authority. To qualify for the payments, the community school 272
shall report to the department, in the form and manner required 273
by the department, data on the number of students transported or 274

H. B. No. 545 Page 11
As Introduced
whose transportation is arranged, the number of miles traveled, 275
cost to transport, and any other information requested by the 276
department. 277
Sec. 3317.071. For any fiscal year that the general 278
assembly has appropriated sufficient funds to operate the 279
program, the department of education and workforce shall 280
implement a program to distribute bus purchasing grants of not 281
less than $45,000 to city, local, and exempted village school 282
districts for the purpose of replacing the oldest and highest 283
mileage buses in the state assigned to routes. The department 284
shall collect annually age, mileage, and vehicle condition data 285
from districts through its transportation data collection 286
system. 287
Sec. 3327.01. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 288
3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, 289
this section and sections 3327.011, 3327.012, and 3327.02 of the 290
Revised Code do not apply to any joint vocational or cooperative 291
education school district. 292
In all city, local, and exempted village school districts 293
where resident school pupils in grades kindergarten through 294
eight live more than two miles from the school for which the 295
director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards 296
pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code 297
and to which they are assigned by the board of education of the 298
district of residence or to and from the nonpublic or community 299
school which they attend, the board of education shall provide 300
transportation for such pupils to and from that school except as 301
provided in section 3327.02 of the Revised Code. 302
In all city, local, and exempted village school districts 303
where pupil transportation is required under a career-technical 304

H. B. No. 545 Page 12
As Introduced
plan approved by the department of education and workforce under 305
section 3313.90 of the Revised Code, for any student attending a 306
career-technical program operated by another school district, 307
including a joint vocational school district, as prescribed 308
under that section, the board of education of the student's 309
district of residence shall provide transportation from the 310
public high school operated by that district to which the 311
student is assigned to the career-technical program. 312
In all city, local, and exempted village school districts, 313
the board may provide transportation for resident school pupils 314
in grades nine through twelve to and from the high school to 315
which they are assigned by the board of education of the 316
district of residence or to and from the nonpublic or community 317
high school which they attend for which the director of 318
education and workforce prescribes minimum standards pursuant to 319
division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. 320
A board of education shall not be required to transport 321
elementary or high school pupils to and from a nonpublic or 322
community school where such transportation would require more 323
than thirty minutes of direct travel time as measured by school 324
bus from the public school building to which the pupils would be 325
assigned if attending the public school designated by the 326
district of residence. 327
Where it is impractical to transport a pupil by school 328
conveyance, a board of education may offer payment, in lieu of 329
providing such transportation in accordance with section 3327.02 330
of the Revised Code. 331
A Except as provided in section 3327.016 of the Revised 332
Code, a board of education shall provide transportation to 333
students enrolled in a community school or nonpublic school in 334

H. B. No. 545 Page 13
As Introduced
accordance with this section on each day in which that school is 335
open for operation with students in attendance, regardless of 336
whether the district's own schools are open for operation with 337
students in attendance on that day. However, a board of 338
education shall not be required to transport elementary or high 339
school pupils to and from a nonpublic or community school on 340
Saturday or Sunday, unless a board of education and a nonpublic 341
or community school have an agreement in place to do so before 342
the first day of July of the school year in which the agreement 343
takes effect. 344
In all city, local, and exempted village school districts, 345
the board shall provide transportation for all children who are 346
so disabled that they are unable to walk to and from the school 347
for which the director of education and workforce prescribes 348
minimum standards pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of 349
the Revised Code and which they attend. In case of dispute 350
whether the child is able to walk to and from the school, the 351
health commissioner shall be the judge of such ability. In all 352
city, exempted village, and local school districts, the board 353
shall provide transportation to and from school or special 354
education classes for mentally disabled children in accordance 355
with standards adopted by the department of education and 356
workforce. 357
When transportation of pupils is provided the conveyance 358
shall be run on a time schedule that shall be adopted and put in 359
force by the board not later than ten days after the beginning 360
of the school term. The operator of every school bus or motor 361
van owned and operated by any school district or educational 362
service center or privately owned and operated under contract 363
with any school district or service center in this state shall 364
deliver students enrolled in preschool through twelfth grades to 365

H. B. No. 545 Page 14
As Introduced
their respective public and nonpublic schools not sooner than 366
thirty minutes prior to the beginning of school and to be 367
available to pick them up not later than thirty minutes after 368
the close of their respective schools each day. Further, 369
operators shall not deliver students late to school. 370
The cost of any transportation service authorized by this 371
section shall be paid first out of federal funds, if any, 372
available for the purpose of pupil transportation, and secondly 373
out of state appropriations, in accordance with regulations 374
adopted by the department. 375
No transportation of any pupils shall be provided by any 376
board of education to or from any school which in the selection 377
of pupils, faculty members, or employees, practices 378
discrimination against any person on the grounds of race, color, 379
religion, or national origin. 380
A board of education shall provide transportation as a 381
related service for all children with disabilities living in the 382
school district who are enrolled in a nonpublic school if the 383
school district is provided with supporting documentation from 384
the child's individual education program developed pursuant to 385
Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code or an individual service plan 386
developed pursuant to section 5126.41 of the Revised Code. 387
Sec. 3327.016. (A) As used in this section, "eligible 388
student" means a student entitled to transportation services 389
from the city, local, or exempted village school district 390
pursuant to section 3327.01 of the Revised Code. 391
(B) Each community school established under Chapter 3314. 392
of the Revised Code or chartered nonpublic school shall 393
establish the school's start and end times for a particular 394

H. B. No. 545 Page 15
As Introduced
school year not later than the first day of April prior to that 395
school year. Each community or chartered nonpublic school shall 396
provide such start and end times to each city, local, or 397
exempted village school district that the school expects will be 398
responsible for providing transportation services to eligible 399
students enrolled in the school for that school year. 400
Each city, local, or exempted village school district that 401
receives start and end times for a chartered nonpublic school 402
under this division shall establish tiers of windows of time 403
that best work for the district in transporting the school's 404
eligible students. If a chartered nonpublic school's start and 405
end times fall within one of those tiers, the district shall 406
notify the school of that fact. If a chartered nonpublic 407
school's start and end times do not fall within one of those 408
tiers, the district shall notify the school of that fact and 409
provide the opportunity for the school to change its start and 410
end times. If such school does not change its start and end 411
times, the district is not required to transport the school's 412
students to and from school. 413
(C) Each city, local, or exempted village school district 414
that receives start and end times as prescribed from a community 415
school under division (B) of this section, or receives start and 416
end times from a chartered nonpublic school that fall within one 417
of the tiers of windows of time under division (B) of this 418
section, shall use those start and end times to develop a 419
transportation plan, including transportation routes and 420
schedules, for eligible students who enrolled in a the community 421
or chartered nonpublic school and shall provide such 422
transportation plan to the community or chartered nonpublic 423
school within sixty days after receiving the information 424
described in that division. If a school provides the start and 425

H. B. No. 545 Page 16
As Introduced
end times to the school district after the first day of April 426
but before the first day of July, the district shall attempt to 427
provide a transportation plan to the school by the first day of 428
August of that school year. For any eligible student who enrolls 429
in a community school, or a chartered nonpublic school that has 430
start and end times that fall within one of the tiers of windows 431
of time under division (B) of this section, after the first day 432
of July prior to that school year, a district shall develop a 433
transportation plan, including transportation routes and 434
schedules, for that student within fourteen business days of 435
receiving a request for transportation services from the 436
student's parent or guardian. 437
Sec. 3327.021. (A) The department of education and 438
workforce shall monitor each city, local, or exempted village 439
school district's compliance with sections 3327.01 and 3327.016 440
and division (B) of section 3327.017 of the Revised Code. Except 441
as provided in division (B) of this section, if the department 442
determines a consistent or prolonged period of noncompliance on 443
the part of the school district to provide transportation as 444
required under those sections, the department shall deduct from 445
the district's payment for student transportation under Chapter 446
3317. of the Revised Code the daily amount of that payment, as 447
computed by the department, for the number of students who did 448
not receive the required transportation, including students who 449
arrived to school late, under those sections for each day that 450
the district is not in compliance. 451
(B) A school district shall not be penalized under this 452
section if the department determines that extenuating 453
circumstances caused the district's failure to comply. The 454
department shall develop a process under which a district may 455
submit information explaining the extenuating circumstances that 456

H. B. No. 545 Page 17
As Introduced
led to its failure to comply and on how the department may 457
determine that those circumstances caused the failure. 458
This section does not affect the authority of a school 459
district to provide payment in lieu of transportation in 460
accordance with section 3327.02 of the Revised Code. 461
Section 2. That existing sections 3317.0212, 3327.01, and 462
3327.016 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 463
Section 3. That section 3327.021 of the Revised Code is 464
hereby repealed. 465
Section 4. That Sections 265.10, 265.300, 512.10, and 466
516.10 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly be amended to 467
read as follows: 468
Sec. 265.10. 469
470
1 2 3 4 5
A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 200321 Operating Expenses $14,474,898 $15,054,312
D GRF 200416 Career Technical $2,500,000 $2,500,000
Education
E GRF 200420 Information Technology $4,231,479 $4,316,527
Development and Support
F GRF 200422 School Management $2,800,000 $2,800,000
Assistance

H. B. No. 545 Page 18
As Introduced
G GRF 200424 Policy Analysis $500,000 $516,419
H GRF 200426 Ohio Educational Computer $18,994,000 $18,994,000
Network
I GRF 200427 Academic Standards $5,535,410 $5,429,033
J GRF 200437 Student Assessment $50,609,125 $50,882,346
K GRF 200439 Accountability/Report $7,369,440 $7,437,742
Cards
L GRF 200446 Education Management $9,958,226 $10,325,278
Information System
M GRF 200448 Educator and Principal $2,663,493 $2,676,754
Preparation
N GRF 200455 Community Schools and $4,370,165 $4,446,705
Choice Programs
O GRF 200457 STEM Initiatives $500,000 $500,000
P GRF 200465 Education Technology $2,893,949 $2,906,346
Resources
Q GRF 200478 Industry-Recognized $16,000,000 $16,000,000
Credentials High School
Students
R GRF 200502 Pupil Transportation $882,035,414 $959,429,701
$1,001,429,701
S GRF 200505 School Meal Programs $13,163,000 $13,163,000

H. B. No. 545 Page 19
As Introduced
T GRF 200511 Auxiliary Services $170,292,963 $172,262,613
U GRF 200532 Nonpublic Administrative $76,935,110 $77,824,960
Cost Reimbursement
V GRF 200540 Special Education $193,272,426 $193,272,426
Enhancements
W GRF 200545 Career-Technical $13,413,000 $13,413,000
Education Enhancements
X GRF 200550 Foundation Funding - All $8,457,598,772 $8,733,217,991
Students
$8,729,217,991
Y GRF 200566 Literacy Improvement $2,472,674 $2,500,000
Z GRF 200572 Adult Education Programs $9,348,399 $15,688,404
AA GRF 200574 Half-Mill Maintenance $6,420,640 $6,152,450
Equalization
AB GRF 200576 Adaptive Sports Program $400,000 $400,000
AC GRF 200597 Program and Project $2,850,000 $2,750,000
Support
AD General Revenue Fund Total $9,971,602,583 $10,334,860,007
$10,372,860,007
AE Dedicated Purpose Fund Group
AF 4520 200638 Charges and $1,500,000 $1,500,000
Reimbursements

H. B. No. 545 Page 20
As Introduced
AG 5980 200659 Auxiliary Services $650,000 $650,000
Reimbursement
AH 5H30 200687 School District Solvency $2,000,000 $2,000,000
Assistance
AI 5KX0 200691 Ohio School Sponsorship $1,900,000 $1,900,000
Program
AJ 5MM0 200677 Child Nutrition Refunds $550,000 $550,000
AK 5U20 200685 National Education $185,000 $185,000
Statistics
AL 5VS0 200604 Foundation Funding - All $600,000,000 $600,000,000
Students
AM 5VU0 200663 School Bus Purchase $0 $50,000,000
AN 5YO0 200491 Public and Nonpublic $171,200,000 $171,200,000
Education Support
AO 6200 200615 Educational Improvement $600,000 $600,000
Grants
AP Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $778,585,000 $778,585,000
$828,585,000
AQ Internal Service Activity Fund Group
AR 1380 200606 Information Technology $18,394,387 $18,597,721
Development and Support
AS 4R70 200695 Indirect Operational $9,944,311 $10,166,435

H. B. No. 545 Page 21
As Introduced
Support
AT 4V70 200633 Interagency Program $3,000,000 $3,000,000
Support
AU Internal Service Activity Fund Group $31,338,698 $31,764,156
Total
AV State Lottery Fund Group
AW 7017 200413 School Bus Safety $10,000,000 $0
AX 7017 200612 Foundation Funding - All $1,436,583,202 $1,398,174,884
Students
AY 7017 200614 Accelerate Great Schools $1,500,000 $1,500,000
AZ 7017 200631 Quality Community and $115,000,000 $125,000,000
Independent STEM Schools
Support
BA 7017 200684 Community School $90,155,000 $90,155,000
Facilities
BB 7017 2006A7 Literacy Coaches $12,000,000 $12,000,000
BC State Lottery Fund Group Total $1,665,238,202 $1,626,829,884
BD Federal Fund Group
BE 3120 2006A9 Aspire - Federal $0 $18,996,799
BF 3670 200607 School Food Services $13,379,350 $13,379,350
BG 3700 200624 Education of Exceptional $1,750,000 $1,750,000

H. B. No. 545 Page 22
As Introduced
Children
BH 3AF0 657601 Schools Medicaid $150,000 $150,000
Administrative Claims
BI 3EH0 200620 Migrant Education $1,700,000 $1,700,000
BJ 3EJ0 200622 Homeless Children $4,823,000 $5,112,380
Education
BK 3GE0 200674 Summer Food Service $23,000,000 $23,000,000
Program
BL 3GG0 200676 Fresh Fruit and Vegetable $5,500,000 $6,000,000
Program
BM 3HF0 200649 Federal Education Grants $5,000,000 $5,000,000
BN 3HI0 200634 Student Support and $54,131,000 $50,604,930
Academic Enrichment
BO 3HL0 200678 Comprehensive Literacy $14,630,000 $14,630,000
State Development Program
BP 3L60 200617 Federal School Lunch $565,999,000 $595,000,000
BQ 3L70 200618 Federal School Breakfast $195,000,000 $205,000,000
BR 3L80 200619 Child/Adult Food Programs $116,000,000 $118,000,000
BS 3L90 200621 Career-Technical $56,680,000 $58,947,200
Education Basic Grant
BT 3M00 200623 ESEA Title 1A $677,740,000 $698,072,200

H. B. No. 545 Page 23
As Introduced
BU 3M20 200680 Individuals with $530,400,000 $541,008,000
Disabilities Education
Act
BV 3Y20 200688 21st Century Community $47,940,000 $48,898,800
Learning Centers
BW 3Y60 200635 Improving Teacher Quality $77,157,900 $78,701,058
BX 3Y70 200689 English Language $13,728,000 $14,277,120
Acquisition
BY 3Y80 200639 Rural and Low Income $3,300,000 $3,300,000
Technical Assistance
BZ 3Z20 200690 State Assessments $11,500,000 $11,500,000
CA 3Z30 200645 Consolidated Federal $15,000,000 $15,000,000
Grant Administration
CB Federal Fund Group Total $2,434,508,250 $2,528,027,837
CC TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $14,881,272,733 $15,300,066,884
$15,388,066,884
Sec. 265.300. FOUNDATION FUNDING - ALL STUDENTS 471
The foregoing appropriation item 200604, Foundation 472
Funding - All Students, shall be used in conjunction with 473
appropriation items 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, 474
and 200612, Foundation Funding - All Students, to distribute the 475
amounts calculated for disadvantaged pupil impact aid under 476
sections 3317.022 and 3317.16 of the Revised Code and the 477
portions of the state share of the base cost calculated under 478

H. B. No. 545 Page 24
As Introduced
those sections that are attributable to the staffing cost for 479
the student wellness and success component of the base cost, as 480
determined by the Department of Education and Workforce. 481
SCHOOL BUS PURCHASE 482
The foregoing appropriation item 200663, School Bus 483
Purchase, shall be used to distribute bus purchasing grants to 484
city, local, and exempted village school districts pursuant to 485
section 3317.071 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding any 486
provision of law to the contrary, school bus purchase funds 487
awarded in fiscal year 2027 may be used by recipients through 488
fiscal year 2028. 489
Sec. 512.10. TRANSFERS OUT OF GENERAL REVENUE FUND 490
STATE MARKETING OFFICE FUND 491
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 492
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to 493
$22,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the State 494
Marketing Office Fund (Fund 5MJ0). 495
FOUNDATION FUNDING - ALL STUDENTS FUND 496
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 497
Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to 498
$600,000,000 cash, in each fiscal year, from the General Revenue 499
Fund to the Foundation Funding - All Students Fund (Fund 5VS0). 500
SECOND CHANCE GRANT PROGRAM FUND 501
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 502
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to 503
$4,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Second 504
Chance Grant Program Fund (Fund 5YD0). 505

H. B. No. 545 Page 25
As Introduced
MARCS ADMINISTRATION FUND 506
On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible 507
thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer 508
up to $10,500,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the 509
MARCS Administration Fund (Fund 5C20). 510
WILDLIFE FUND 511
On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible 512
thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer 513
$500,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Wildlife Fund 514
(Fund 7015). 515
TRANSCRANIAL MAGNETIC STIMULATION FUND 516
On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible 517
thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer 518
$5,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the 519
Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation Fund (Fund 5VV0). 520
H2OHIO FUND 521
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 522
Director of Budget and Management may transfer $165,000,000 from 523
the General Revenue Fund to the H2Ohio Fund (Fund 6H20). 524
OHIO MARITIME ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 525
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 526
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $10,000,000 527
cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Ohio Maritime 528
Assistance Fund (Fund 5QT0). 529
RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT REVOLVING LOAN 530
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 531
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $100,000,000 532

H. B. No. 545 Page 26
As Introduced
cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Residential 533
Development Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 5CT1). 534
RURAL PRACTICE INCENTIVE FUND 535
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 536
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $3,000,000 cash 537
from the General Revenue Fund to the Rural Practice Incentive 538
Fund (Fund 5ZD0). 539
EWARRANT LOCAL INTEGRATION FUND 540
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 541
Director of Budget and Management may transfer $750,000 cash 542
from the General Revenue Fund to the eWarrant Local Integration 543
Fund (Fund 5AZ1). 544
TARGETED ADDICTION PROGRAM FUND 545
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 546
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $12,500,000 547
cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Targeted Addiction 548
Program Fund (Fund 5TZ0). 549
On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 550
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $10,000,000 551
cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Medical Marijuana 552
Control Fund (Fund 5SY0). 553
SCHOOL BUS PURCHASE FUND 554
On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the 555
Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $50,000,000 556
cash from the General Revenue Fund to the School Bus Purchase 557
Fund (Fund 5VU0). 558
Sec. 516.10. CASH TRANSFERS AND ABOLISHMENT OF FUNDS 559

H. B. No. 545 Page 27
As Introduced
(A) On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, 560
the Director of Budget and Management may transfer the cash 561
balance from each of the funds as indicated in the table below 562
to the fund also indicated in the table below. Upon completion 563
of each transfer and on the effective date of its repeal by this 564
actH.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly, where applicable, the 565
fund from which the cash balance was transferred is hereby 566
abolished. 567
568
1 2 3 4 5
A Transfer from: Transfer to:
B User Fund Fund Name Fund Fund Name
Agency
C AGO 5MP0 Peace Officer 5LR0 Ohio Law Enforcement
Training Commission Training Fund
Fund
D AGR 5MA0 Dangerous and 5MS0 Animal and Consumer
Restricted Animal Protection Fund
Fund
E AGR 5PL0 Pet Store License 5MR0 Commercial Dog
Fund Breeding Fund
F DAS 5MV0 Theatre Equipment GRF General Revenue Fund
Maintenance Fund
G DAS 1280 Collective 1250 Human Resources
Bargaining Fund Services Fund

H. B. No. 545 Page 28
As Introduced
H MHA 3A60 Federal- 5AU0 Behavioral Health
Miscellaneous Fund Care Fund
I DPS 3HT0 Justice Emergency GRF General Revenue Fund
Supplemental Funding
Fund
J DPS 5RS0 Community Police 5AZ1 eWarrant Local
Relations Fund Integration Fund
K MCD 5XY0 Hospital Directed 5AN0 State Directed
Payment Fund Payments Fund
L OOD 3L10 Social Security 3790 Consolidated Federal
Reimbursement Fund Fund
M TOS 7090 Job Ready Site GRF General Revenue Fund
Development Bond
Retirement Fund
N LSC 4100 Sale of Publications GRF General Revenue Fund
Fund
O LSC 4F60 Legislative Budget GRF General Revenue Fund
Services Fund
P LSC 5EF0 Legislative Agency GRF General Revenue Fund
Telephone Usage Fund
Q BOR 5RA0 Workforce and Higher GRF General Revenue Fund
Education Programs
Fund
R DOH 5UA0 Emergency GRF General Revenue Fund

H. B. No. 545 Page 29
As Introduced
Preparation and
Response Fund
(B) The following funds are hereby abolished on the 569
effective date of their repeal by this actH.B. 96 of the 136th 570
General Assembly: 571
572
1 2 3
A User Agency Fund Fund Name
B AGR 5HP0 Ohio Livestock Care Standards Fund
C DDD 4U40 Developmental Disabilities Trust Fund
D MCD 3ER0 Health Information Technology Fund
E OBM 5AT1 Statewide Children's Vision Initiative Fund
F OBM 5CV1 Coronavirus Relief Fund
G PRX 3DV0 Enhancing Ohio's PMP Fund
H PRX 3BC0 Dangerous Drug Database Fund
I PRX 3EB0 NASPER Fund
J PRX 3EY0 Administration of PMIX HUB Fund
K PRX 3EZ0 NASPER 10 Fund
L PRX 3CT0 2008 Developing/Enhancing PMP Fund
(C) On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, 573
the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the cash 574

H. B. No. 545 Page 30
As Introduced
balance from each of the funds as indicated in the table below 575
to the fund also indicated in the table below. Upon completion 576
of each transfer and on the effective date of its repeal by this 577
actH.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly, where applicable, the 578
fund from which the cash balance was transferred is hereby 579
abolished. 580
581
1 2 3 4 5
A Transfer from: Transfer to:
B User Fund Fund Name Fund Fund Name
Agency
C DEV 5KN0 Local Government GRF General Revenue Fund
Innovation Fund
(D) On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, 582
the Director of Budget and Management may transfer the cash 583
balance from each of the funds as indicated in the table below 584
to the fund also indicated in the table below after any 585
encumbrances in these funds are fully discharged. Upon 586
completion of each transfer and on the effective date of its 587
repeal by this act, where applicable, the fund from which the 588
cash balance was transferred is hereby abolished. 589
590
1 2 3 4 5
A Transfer from: Transfer to:
B User Fund Fund Name Fund Fund Name
Agency

H. B. No. 545 Page 31
As Introduced
C EDU 5VU0 School Bus Purchase GRF General Revenue
Fund Fund
Section 5. That existing Sections 265.10, 265.300, 512.10, 591
and 516.10 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly are hereby 592
repealed. 593
Section 6. This act shall be known as the School Busing 594
Improvement Act. 595